Wisconsin, session 2025, SB544.
do enact as follows:SB544,11Section 1. 139.30 (1m) of the statutes is renumbered 139.30 (1m) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB544,2,33139.30 (1m) (intro.) “Cigarette” means any of the following:SB544,2,54(a) A roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or any substance other than tobacco 5that is intended for smoking by burning the tobacco.SB544,26Section 2. 139.30 (1m) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB544,2,107139.30 (1m) (b) A roll of tobacco wrapped or contained within any substance 8other than tobacco that involves heating the tobacco without the combustion of the 9tobacco or other flammable material, not including a vapor product, as defined 10under s. 139.75 (14).SB544,311Section 3. 139.31 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB544,2,1312139.31 (1) (a) On cigarettes, as defined under s. 139.30 (1m) (a), weighing not 13more than 3 pounds per thousand, 126 mills on each cigarette.SB544,41Section 4. 139.31 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB544,3,32139.31 (1) (b) On cigarettes, as defined under s. 139.30 (1m) (a), weighing 3more than 3 pounds per thousand, 252 mills on each cigarette.SB544,54Section 5. 139.31 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB544,3,85139.31 (1) (c) In addition to the rate under par. (a), on cigarettes, as defined 6under s. 139.30 (1m) (a), weighing not more than 3 pounds per thousand, on each 7cigarette 8 mills minus the tax imposed on that cigarette under 26 USC 5701, but 8not less than zero.SB544,69Section 6. 139.31 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB544,3,1610139.31 (1) (d) In addition to the rate under par. (b), on cigarettes, as defined 11under s. 139.30 (1m) (a), weighing more than 3 pounds per thousand, on each 12cigarette, 16.8 mills minus the tax imposed on that cigarette under 26 USC 5701, 13except that if the cigarette is more than 6.5 inches in length it shall be taxed at the 14rate under par. (c) rather than at the rate under this paragraph, counting each 2.75 15inches or fraction thereof of the length as one cigarette. The amount under this 16paragraph shall not be less than zero.SB544,717Section 7. 139.31 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB544,3,1918139.31 (1) (e) On cigarettes, as defined under s. 139.30 (1m) (b), weighing not 19more than 3 pounds per thousand, 63 mills on each cigarette.SB544,820Section 8. 139.31 (1) (f) of the statutes is created to read:SB544,3,2221139.31 (1) (f) On cigarettes, as defined under s. 139.30 (1m) (b), weighing 22more than 3 pounds per thousand, 126 mills on each cigarette.SB544,923Section 9. 139.31 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB544,4,324139.31 (1) (g) In addition to the rate under par. (e), on cigarettes, as defined 1under s. 139.30 (1m) (b), weighing not more than 3 pounds per thousand, on each 2cigarette 4 mills minus the tax imposed on that cigarette under 26 USC 5701, but 3not less than zero.SB544,104Section 10. 139.31 (1) (h) of the statutes is created to read:SB544,4,115139.31 (1) (h) In addition to the rate under par. (f), on cigarettes, as defined 6under s. 139.30 (1m) (b), weighing more than 3 pounds per thousand, on each 7cigarette, 8.4 mills minus the tax imposed on that cigarette under 26 USC 5701, 8except that if the cigarette is more than 6.5 inches in length it shall be taxed at the 9rate under par. (g) rather than at the rate under this paragraph, counting each 2.75 10inches or fraction thereof of the length as one cigarette. The amount under this 11paragraph shall not be less than zero.SB544,1112Section 11. 139.315 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 139.315 (1) (a).SB544,1213Section 12. 139.315 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB544,4,2314139.315 (1) (b) On the effective date of any increase in the sum of the rates 15under s. 139.31 (1) (e) and (g) or in the sum of the rates under s. 139.31 (1) (f) and 16(h), an inventory tax is imposed upon cigarettes held in inventory for sale or resale 17on which the cigarette tax has been paid at the prior rate and upon unaffixed 18stamps in the possession of distributors. Any person who is in possession of any 19such cigarettes or unaffixed stamps shall pay the tax imposed under this section. 20Any person liable for this tax shall determine the number of cigarettes and 21unaffixed stamps in the person’s possession on the effective date of the increase, 22and by the 30th day after the effective date of the increase the person shall file a 23return and shall by that date pay the tax due.SB544,1324Section 13. Effective date.SB544,5,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 2publication.SB544,5,33